Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.63.030

Joint meetings and cooperative action.

Pursuant to the authorization of the legislative body, a code city planning agency may hold joint meetings with one or more city or county planning agencies (including city or county planning agencies in adjoining states) in any combination and may contract with another municipality for planning services. A code city may enter into cooperative arrangements with one or more municipalities and with any regional planning council organized under this chapter for jointly engaging a planning director and such other employees as may be required to operate a joint planning staff.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 81 s 5; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.63.030.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 81: See note following RCW 35A.13.035.